Massachusetts, session 194th, H4323.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of State Police shall establish a sick leave bank for Alexandra Schwartz, an
employee of the Department of State Police. Any employee of the Department may voluntarily
contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Alexandra
Schwartz. If Alexandra Schwartz terminates employment with the Department of State Police or
requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be
transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for
absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave
bank as determined by the Department.
of 1